Mississippi, session 2026, HB236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-106-85, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-106-85.  (1) There is created the African-American Resident Physician Scholarship Program to be administered by the University of Mississippi Medical Center for the purpose of increasing the number of African-American physicians that provide services in underserved municipalities or counties in Mississippi. The University of Mississippi Medical Center shall adopt rules and regulations to administer the scholarship program.     (2)  Upon entering the practice of medicine, a participant in the program must serve in a health professional shortage area (HPSA), medically underserved area (MUA), or rural area otherwise approved for practice in Mississippi for at least five (5) years.  A participant who completes this period of service shall be considered to have fulfilled all financial obligations of repayment under the program. (3)  A participant who completes his or her residency and fails to enter the practice of medicine as required under this section shall be deemed in breach of contract and shall be liable for the immediate repayment of all financial assistance provided to the participant through the African-American Resident Physician Scholarship Program, including assistance provided during undergraduate school, as well as in medical or osteopathic school, along with other penalties that may be prescribed in policy by the board.  Any participant who fails to complete the period of practice for which he or she is obligated to provide services in a health professional shortage area (HPSA), medically underserved area (MUA) or other approved rural area in Mississippi in exchange for financial assistance received through the African-American Resident Physician Scholarship Program shall be liable for the repayment of all financial assistance provided to the participant through the program. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.